Georgia, session 2025_26, HB387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 70 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
service delivery, is amended by revising Code Section 36-70-23, relating to required
components, as such Code section becomes effective on January 1, 2026, as follows:
"36-70-23.
Each local government service delivery strategy shall include the following components:
(1) An identification of all local government services presently provided or primarily
funded by each general purpose local government and each authority within the county,
or providing services within the county, and a description of the geographic area in which
the identified services are provided by each jurisdiction;
H. B. 387
- 1 -

LC 47 3356
(2) An assignment of which local government or authority, pursuant to the requirements
of this article, will provide each service, the geographic areas of the county in which such
services are to be provided, and a description of any services to be provided by any local
government to any geographic area outside its geographical boundaries. In the event two
or more local governments within the county are assigned responsibility for providing
identical services within the same geographic area, the strategy shall include an
explanation of such arrangement;
(3) A description of the source of the funding for each service identified pursuant to
paragraph (2) of this Code section; and
(4) An identification of the mechanisms to be utilized to facilitate the implementation of
the services and funding responsibilities identified pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of
this Code section.; and
(5)(A) As used in this paragraph, the term:
(i) 'Affected municipality' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
36-70-25.2; and
(ii) 'Growth boundary agreement' means an agreement by a county and all
municipalities located wholly or partially within such county that outlines and defines
future potential growth through annexation for such municipalities.
(B) A growth boundary agreement, unless the county and each affected municipality
agree in such service delivery strategy to exclude such a growth boundary agreement."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 387
- 2 -